Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE F. STATE AND LOCAL CONTRACTS AND FUND MANAGEMENT

CHAPTER 2269. CONTRACTING AND DELIVERY PROCEDURES FOR CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 2269.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Architect" means an individual registered as an architect under Chapter 1051, Occupations Code.

(2) "Engineer" means an individual licensed as an engineer under Chapter 1001, Occupations Code.

(3) "Facility" means, unless otherwise specifically provided, an improvement to real property.

(4) "General conditions" in the context of a contract for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility means on-site management, administrative personnel, insurance, bonds, equipment, utilities, and incidental work, including minor field labor and materials.

(5) "General contractor" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that assumes the risk for constructing, rehabilitating, altering, or repairing all or part of a facility at the contracted price.

(6) "Public work contract" means a contract for constructing, altering, or repairing a public building or carrying out or completing any public work.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER TO GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES ENGAGED IN PUBLIC WORKS. This chapter applies to a public work contract made by a governmental entity authorized by state law to make a public work contract, including:

(1) a state agency as defined by Section 2151.002, including the Texas Facilities Commission;

(2) a local government, including:

(A) a county;

(B) a municipality;

(C) a school district;

(D) any other special district or authority, including a hospital district, a defense base development authority established under Chapter 379B, Local Government Code, and a conservation and reclamation district, including a river authority or any other type of water district; and

(E) any other political subdivision of this state;

(3) a public junior college as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; and

(4) a board of trustees governed by Chapter 54, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.003. CONFLICT OF LAWS; REQUIREMENT TO FOLLOW PROCEDURES OF THIS CHAPTER. (a) Except as provided by this section, this chapter prevails over any other law relating to a public work contract.

(b) This chapter does not prevail over a conflicting provision in a law relating to contracting with a historically underutilized business.

(c) This chapter does not prevail over a conflicting provision in an ordinance or resolution passed by the governing body of a municipally owned electric utility in a procedure described by Section 252.022(c), Local Government Code, that:

(1) requires the use of competitive bidding or competitive sealed proposals; or

(2) prescribes a design-build procurement procedure that conflicts with this chapter.

(d) This chapter does not prevail over any law, rule, or regulation relating to competitive bidding or competitive sealed proposals for construction services, or to procurement of construction services pursuant to Section 49.273, Water Code, that applies to a river authority or to a conservation and reclamation district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, unless the governing body of the river authority or conservation and reclamation district elects to permit this chapter to supersede the law, rule, or regulation.

(e) This chapter does not prevail over a conflicting provision in a regulation that prescribes procurement procedures for construction services that is adopted by the governing board of a river authority or of a conservation and reclamation district created pursuant to Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, that owns electric generation capacity in excess of 2,500 megawatts, except with respect to Subchapter H.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.004. EXEMPTION: TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION; HIGHWAY PROJECTS. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a contract entered into by the Texas Department of Transportation; or

(2) a project that receives money from a state or federal highway fund.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.005. APPLICABILITY: INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education," "public junior college," and "university system" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) This chapter applies to a public junior college but does not apply to:

(1) any other institution of higher education; or

(2) a university system.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.006. EXEMPTION: REGIONAL TOLLWAY AUTHORITIES. This chapter does not apply to a regional tollway authority under Chapter 366, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.007. EXEMPTION: CERTAIN LOCAL GOVERNMENT CORPORATION IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS. This chapter does not apply to an improvement project undertaken by or through a local government corporation exempt from competitive bidding requirements or restrictions under Section 431.110, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.008. EXEMPTION: REGIONAL MOBILITY AUTHORITIES. This chapter does not apply to a regional mobility authority under Chapter 370, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.009. EXEMPTION: COUNTY TOLL AUTHORITIES. This chapter does not apply to a project of a county under Chapter 284, Transportation Code, unless the county adopts an order electing to be governed by this chapter for a project to be developed by the county under Chapter 284.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.010. EXEMPTION: COORDINATED COUNTY TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY. This chapter does not apply to a coordinated county transportation authority under Chapter 460, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 2269.051. RULES. A governmental entity may adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.052. NOTICE REQUIREMENTS. (a) A governmental entity shall advertise or publish notice of requests for bids, proposals, or qualifications in a manner prescribed by law.

(b) For a contract entered into by a governmental entity under a method provided by this chapter, the governmental entity shall publish notice of the time and place the bid or proposal or request for qualifications will be received and opened in a manner prescribed by law.

(c) For a contract entered into by a municipality, river authority, conservation and reclamation district created pursuant to Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and located in a county with a population of more than 250,000, or defense base development authority under any of the methods provided by this chapter, the municipality, river authority, conservation and reclamation district created pursuant to Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and located in a county with a population of more than 250,000, or defense base development authority shall publish notice of the time and place the bids or proposals, or the responses to a request for qualifications, will be received and opened. The notice must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the defense base development authority's or municipality's central administrative office is located or the county in which the greatest amount of the river authority's or such conservation and reclamation district's territory is located once each week for at least two weeks before the deadline for receiving bids, proposals, or responses. If there is not a newspaper of general circulation in that county, the notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county nearest the county seat of the county in which the defense base development authority's or municipality's central administrative office is located or the county in which the greatest amount of the river authority's or such conservation and reclamation district's territory is located. In a two-step procurement process, the time and place the second step bids, proposals, or responses will be received are not required to be published separately.

(d) For a contract entered into by a county under any of the methods provided by this chapter, the county shall publish notice of the time and place the bids or proposals, or the responses to a request for qualifications, will be received and opened. The notice must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once each week for at least two weeks before the deadline for receiving bids, proposals, or responses. If there is not a newspaper of general circulation in the county, the notice shall be:

(1) posted at the courthouse door of the county; and

(2) published in a newspaper of general circulation in the nearest county.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.053. DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY. (a) The governing body of a governmental entity may delegate its authority under this chapter regarding an action authorized or required by this chapter to a designated representative, committee, or other person.

(b) The governmental entity shall provide notice of the delegation, the limits of the delegation, and the name or title of each person designated under Subsection (a) by rule or in the request for bids, proposals, or qualifications or in an addendum to the request.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.054. RIGHT TO WORK. (a) This section applies to a governmental entity when the governmental entity is engaged in:

(1) procuring goods or services under this chapter;

(2) awarding a contract under this chapter; or

(3) overseeing procurement or construction for a public work or public improvement under this chapter.

(b) In engaging in an activity to which this section applies, a governmental entity:

(1) may not consider whether a person is a member of or has another relationship with any organization; and

(2) shall ensure that its bid specifications and any subsequent contract or other agreement do not deny or diminish the right of a person to work because of the person's membership or other relationship status with respect to an organization.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.0541. AGREEMENT WITH COLLECTIVE BARGAINING ORGANIZATION. (a) A governmental entity awarding a public work contract funded with state money, including the issuance of debt guaranteed by this state, may not:

(1) prohibit, require, discourage, or encourage a person bidding on the public work contract, including a contractor or subcontractor, from entering into or adhering to an agreement with a collective bargaining organization relating to the project; or

(2) discriminate against a person described by Subdivision (1) based on the person's involvement in the agreement, including the person's:

(A) status or lack of status as a party to the agreement; or

(B) willingness or refusal to enter into the agreement.

(b) This section may not be construed to:

(1) prohibit activity protected by the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.), including entering into an agreement with a collective bargaining organization relating to the project; or

(2) permit conduct prohibited under the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 366 (H.B. 985), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2269.055. CRITERIA TO CONSIDER. (a) In determining the award of a contract under this chapter, the governmental entity may consider:

(1) the price;

(2) the offeror's experience and reputation;

(3) the quality of the offeror's goods or services;

(4) the impact on the ability of the governmental entity to comply with rules relating to historically underutilized businesses;

(5) the offeror's safety record;

(6) the offeror's proposed personnel;

(7) whether the offeror's financial capability is appropriate to the size and scope of the project; and

(8) any other relevant factor specifically listed in the request for bids, proposals, or qualifications.

(b) In determining the award of a contract under this chapter, the governmental entity shall:

(1) consider and apply any existing laws, including any criteria, related to historically underutilized businesses; and

(2) consider and apply any existing laws, rules, or applicable municipal charters, including laws applicable to local governments, related to the use of women, minority, small, or disadvantaged businesses.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.056. USING METHOD OTHER THAN COMPETITIVE BIDDING FOR CONSTRUCTION SERVICES; EVALUATION OF PROPOSALS; CRITERIA. (a) The governing body of a governmental entity that considers a construction contract using a method authorized by this chapter other than competitive bidding must, before advertising, determine which method provides the best value for the governmental entity.

(b) The governmental entity shall base its selection among offerors on applicable criteria listed for the particular method used. The governmental entity shall publish in the request for proposals or qualifications:

(1) the criteria that will be used to evaluate the offerors;

(2) the applicable weighted value for each criterion; and

(3) a detailed methodology for scoring each criterion.

(c) The governmental entity shall document the basis of its selection and shall make the evaluations public not later than the seventh day after the date the contract is awarded.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 556 (S.B. 533), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 2581), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 2269.057. ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER SERVICES. (a) An architect or engineer required to be selected or designated under this chapter has full responsibility for complying with Chapter 1051 or 1001, Occupations Code, as applicable.

(b) If the selected or designated architect or engineer is not a full-time employee of the governmental entity, the governmental entity shall select the architect or engineer on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications as provided by Section 2254.004.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.058. USE OF OTHER PROFESSIONAL SERVICES. (a) Independently of the contractor, construction manager-at-risk, or design-build firm, the governmental entity shall provide or contract for the construction materials engineering, testing, and inspection services and the verification testing services necessary for acceptance of the facility by the governmental entity.

(b) The governmental entity shall select the services for which it contracts under this section in accordance with Section 2254.004.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.059. SEALED BIDS, PROPOSALS, OR QUALIFICATIONS REQUIRED. A person who submits a bid, proposal, or qualification to a governmental entity shall seal it before delivery.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.060. DOCUMENTS RELATED TO EVALUATION AND RANKING. (a) An offeror who submits a bid, proposal, or response to a request for qualifications for a construction contract under this chapter may, after the contract is awarded, make a request in writing to the governmental entity to provide documents related to the evaluation of the offeror's submission.

(b) Not later than the 30th day after the date a request is made under Subsection (a), the governmental entity shall deliver to the offeror the documents relating to the evaluation of the submission including, if applicable, its ranking of the submission.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 2581), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. COMPETITIVE BIDDING METHOD

Sec. 2269.101. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: COMPETITIVE BIDDING. (a) In this chapter, "competitive bidding" is a procurement method by which a governmental entity contracts with a contractor for the construction, alteration, rehabilitation, or repair of a facility by awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or other law, a governmental entity may contract for the construction, alteration, rehabilitation, or repair of a facility only after the entity advertises for bids for the contract in a manner prescribed by law, receives competitive bids, and awards the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.102. USE OF ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER. The governmental entity shall select or designate an architect or engineer in accordance with Chapter 1051 or 1001, Occupations Code, as applicable, to prepare the construction documents required for a project to be awarded by competitive bidding.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.103. PREPARATION OF REQUEST. The governmental entity shall prepare a request for competitive bids that includes construction documents, estimated budget, project scope, estimated project completion date, and other information that a contractor may require to submit a bid.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.104. EVALUATION OF OFFERORS. The governmental entity shall receive, publicly open, and read aloud the names of the offerors and their bids.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.105. SELECTION OF OFFEROR. Not later than the seventh day after the date the contract is awarded, the governmental entity shall document the basis of its selection and shall make the evaluations public.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.106. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER COMPETITIVE BIDDING LAW TO CERTAIN LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES. Except as otherwise specifically provided by this section, Subchapter B, Chapter 271, Local Government Code, does not apply to a competitive bidding process conducted under this chapter. Sections 271.026, 271.027(a), and 271.0275, Local Government Code, apply to a competitive bidding process conducted under this chapter by a governmental entity as defined by Section 271.021, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSAL METHOD

Sec. 2269.151. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSALS. (a) In this chapter, "competitive sealed proposals" is a procurement method by which a governmental entity requests proposals, ranks the offerors, negotiates as prescribed, and then contracts with a general contractor for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility.

(b) In selecting a contractor through competitive sealed proposals, a governmental entity shall follow the procedures provided by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.152. USE OF ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER. The governmental entity shall select or designate an architect or engineer to prepare construction documents for the project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.153. PREPARATION OF REQUEST. (a) In this section, "civil works project" has the meaning assigned by Section 2269.351.

(b) The governmental entity shall prepare a request for competitive sealed proposals that includes construction documents, selection criteria and the weighted value for each criterion, estimated budget, project scope, estimated project completion date, and other information that a contractor may require to respond to the request.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), for civil works projects, the weighted value assigned to price must be at least 50 percent of the total weighted value of all selection criteria.

(d) If the governing body of a governmental entity determines that assigning a lower weighted value to price is in the public interest, the governmental entity may assign to price a weighted value of not less than 36.9 percent of the total weighted value of all selection criteria.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 2581), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 2269.154. EVALUATION OF OFFERORS. (a) The governmental entity shall receive, publicly open, and read aloud the names of the offerors and any monetary proposals made by the offerors.

(b) Not later than the 45th day after the date on which the proposals are opened, the governmental entity shall evaluate and rank each proposal submitted in relation to the published selection criteria.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.155. SELECTION OF OFFEROR. (a) The governmental entity shall select the offeror that submits the proposal that offers the best value for the governmental entity based on:

(1) the selection criteria in the request for proposal and the weighted value for those criteria in the request for proposal; and

(2) its ranking evaluation.

(b) The governmental entity shall first attempt to negotiate a contract with the selected offeror. The governmental entity and its architect or engineer may discuss with the selected offeror options for a scope or time modification and any price change associated with the modification.

(c) If the governmental entity is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the selected offeror, the governmental entity shall, formally and in writing, end negotiations with that offeror and proceed to the next offeror in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or all proposals are rejected.

(d) Not later than the seventh business day after the date the contract is awarded, the governmental entity shall make the evaluations, including any scores, public and provide them to all offerors.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 2581), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT METHOD

Sec. 2269.201. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT. (a) In this chapter, the "construction manager-agent method" is a delivery method by which a governmental entity contracts with a construction manager-agent to provide consultation or administrative services during the design and construction phase and to manage multiple contracts with various construction prime contractors.

(b) A construction manager-agent is a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that serves as the agent for the governmental entity by providing construction administration and management services described by Subsection (a) for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility.

(c) A governmental entity may retain a construction manager-agent for assistance in the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility only as provided by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.202. CONTRACT PROVISIONS OF CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT. The contract between the governmental entity and the construction manager-agent may require the construction manager-agent to provide:

(1) administrative personnel;

(2) equipment necessary to perform duties under this subchapter;

(3) on-site management; and

(4) other services specified in the contract.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.203. LIMITS ON CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT. A construction manager-agent may not:

(1) self-perform any aspect of the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of the facility;

(2) be a party to a construction subcontract for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of the facility; or

(3) provide or be required to provide performance and payment bonds for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of the facility.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.204. FIDUCIARY CAPACITY OF CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT. A construction manager-agent represents the governmental entity in a fiduciary capacity.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.205. USE OF ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER. (a) On or before the selection of a construction manager-agent, the governmental entity shall select or designate an architect or engineer in accordance with Chapter 1051 or 1001, Occupations Code, as applicable, to prepare the construction documents for the project.

(b) The governmental entity's architect or engineer may not serve, alone or in combination with another person, as the construction manager-agent unless the architect or engineer is hired to serve as the construction manager-agent under a separate or concurrent selection process conducted in accordance with this subchapter. This subsection does not prohibit the governmental entity's architect or engineer from providing customary construction phase services under the architect's or engineer's original professional service agreement in accordance with applicable licensing laws.

(c) To the extent that the construction manager-agent's services are defined as part of the practice of architecture or engineering under Chapter 1051 or 1001, Occupations Code, those services must be conducted by a person licensed under the applicable chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.206. SELECTION OF CONTRACTORS. A governmental entity using the construction manager-agent method shall procure, in accordance with applicable law and in any manner authorized by this chapter, a general contractor or trade contractors who will serve as the prime contractor for their specific portion of the work and provide performance and payment bonds to the governmental entity in accordance with applicable laws.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.207. SELECTION OF CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AGENT. A governmental entity shall select a construction manager-agent on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications in the same manner that an architect or engineer is selected under Section 2254.004.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.208. INSURANCE. A construction manager-agent selected under this subchapter shall maintain professional liability or errors and omissions insurance in the amount of at least $1 million for each occurrence.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER F. CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AT-RISK METHOD

Sec. 2269.251. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-AT-RISK. (a) In this chapter, the "construction manager-at-risk method" is a delivery method by which a governmental entity contracts with an architect or engineer for design and construction phase services and contracts separately with a construction manager-at-risk to serve as the general contractor and to provide consultation during the design and construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility.

(b) A construction manager-at-risk is a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that assumes the risk for construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility at the contracted price as a general contractor and provides consultation to the governmental entity regarding construction during and after the design of the facility. The contracted price may be a guaranteed maximum price.

(c) A governmental entity may use the construction manager-at-risk method in selecting a general contractor for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility only as provided by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.252. USE OF ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER. (a) On or before the selection of a construction manager-at-risk, the governmental entity shall select or designate an architect or engineer to prepare the construction documents for the project.

(b) The governmental entity's architect or engineer for a project, or an entity related to the governmental entity's architect or engineer, may not serve, alone or in combination with another person, as the construction manager-at-risk. This subsection does not prohibit the governmental entity's architect or engineer from providing customary construction phase services under the architect's or engineer's original professional service agreement in accordance with applicable licensing laws.

(c) For purposes of Subsection (b), an entity is related to the governmental entity's architect or engineer if the entity is a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity that is a subsidiary, parent corporation, or partner or has any other relationship in which the governmental entity's architect or engineer has an ownership interest, or is subject to common ownership or control, or is party to an agreement by which it will receive any proceeds of the construction manager-at-risk's payments from the governmental entity.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 788 (H.B. 2634), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2269.253. SELECTION PROCESS. (a) The governmental entity shall select the construction manager-at-risk in a one-step or two-step process.

(b) The governmental entity shall prepare a single request for proposals, in the case of a one-step process, and an initial request for qualifications, in the case of a two-step process, that includes:

(1) a statement as to whether the selection process is a one-step or two-step process;

(2) general information on the project site, project scope, schedule, selection criteria and the weighted value for each criterion, and estimated budget and the time and place for receipt of the proposals or qualifications; and

(3) other information that may assist the governmental entity in its selection of a construction manager-at-risk.

(c) The governmental entity shall state the selection criteria in the request for proposals or qualifications.

(d) If a one-step process is used, the governmental entity may request, as part of the offeror's proposal, proposed fees and prices for fulfilling the general conditions.

(e) If a two-step process is used, the governmental entity may not request fees or prices in step one. In step two, the governmental entity may request that five or fewer offerors, selected solely on the basis of qualifications, provide additional information, including the construction manager-at-risk's proposed fee and prices for fulfilling the general conditions.

(f) At each step, the governmental entity shall receive, publicly open, and read aloud the names of the offerors. At the appropriate step, the governmental entity shall also read aloud the fees and prices, if any, stated in each proposal as the proposal is opened.

(g) Not later than the 45th day after the date on which the final proposals are opened, the governmental entity shall evaluate and rank each proposal submitted in relation to the criteria set forth in the request for proposals.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.254. SELECTION OF OFFEROR. (a) The governmental entity shall select the offeror that submits the proposal that offers the best value for the governmental entity based on the published selection criteria and on its ranking evaluation.

(b) The governmental entity shall first attempt to negotiate a contract with the selected offeror.

(c) If the governmental entity is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the selected offeror, the governmental entity shall, formally and in writing, end negotiations with that offeror and proceed to negotiate with the next offeror in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or negotiations with all ranked offerors end.

(d) Not later than the seventh day after the date the contract is awarded, the governmental entity shall make the rankings determined under Section 2269.253(g) public.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(11), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.255. PERFORMANCE OF WORK. (a) A construction manager-at-risk shall publicly advertise for bids or proposals and receive bids or proposals from trade contractors or subcontractors for the performance of all major elements of the work other than the minor work that may be included in the general conditions.

(b) A construction manager-at-risk may seek to perform portions of the work itself if:

(1) the construction manager-at-risk submits its bid or proposal for those portions of the work in the same manner as all other trade contractors or subcontractors; and

(2) the governmental entity determines that the construction manager-at-risk's bid or proposal provides the best value for the governmental entity.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.256. REVIEW OF BIDS OR PROPOSALS. (a) The construction manager-at-risk shall review all trade contractor or subcontractor bids or proposals in a manner that does not disclose the contents of the bid or proposal during the selection process to a person not employed by the construction manager-at-risk, architect, engineer, or governmental entity. All bids or proposals shall be made available to the governmental entity on request and to the public after the later of the award of the contract or the seventh day after the date of final selection of bids or proposals.

(b) If the construction manager-at-risk reviews, evaluates, and recommends to the governmental entity a bid or proposal from a trade contractor or subcontractor but the governmental entity requires another bid or proposal to be accepted, the governmental entity shall compensate the construction manager-at-risk by a change in price, time, or guaranteed maximum cost for any additional cost and risk that the construction manager-at-risk incurs because of the governmental entity's requirement that another bid or proposal be accepted.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.257. DEFAULT; PERFORMANCE OF WORK. If a selected trade contractor or subcontractor defaults in the performance of its work or fails to execute a subcontract after being selected in accordance with this subchapter, the construction manager-at-risk may itself fulfill, without advertising, the contract requirements or select a replacement trade contractor or subcontractor to fulfill the contract requirements.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.258. PERFORMANCE OR PAYMENT BOND. (a) If a fixed contract amount or guaranteed maximum price has not been determined at the time the contract is awarded, the penal sums of the performance and payment bonds delivered to the governmental entity must each be in an amount equal to the construction budget, as specified in the request for proposals or qualifications.

(b) The construction manager-at-risk shall deliver the bonds not later than the 10th day after the date the construction manager-at-risk executes the contract unless the construction manager-at-risk furnishes a bid bond or other financial security acceptable to the governmental entity to ensure that the construction manager will furnish the required performance and payment bonds when a guaranteed maximum price is established.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER G. BUILDING USING DESIGN-BUILD METHOD

Sec. 2269.301. CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES: DESIGN-BUILD. In this chapter, "design-build" is a project delivery method by which a governmental entity contracts with a single entity to provide both design and construction services for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a facility.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.302. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER TO BUILDINGS; EXCEPTIONS. This subchapter applies only to a facility that is a building or an associated structure, including an electric utility structure. This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) a highway, road, street, bridge, underground utility, water supply project, water plant, wastewater plant, water and wastewater distribution or conveyance facility, wharf, dock, airport runway or taxiway, drainage project, or related type of project associated with civil engineering construction; or

(2) a building or structure that is incidental to a project that is primarily a civil engineering construction project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.303. CONTRACTS FOR BUILDINGS: DESIGN-BUILD. A governmental entity may use the design-build method for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a building or associated structure only as provided by this subchapter. In using that method, the governmental entity shall enter into a single contract with a design-build firm for the design and construction of the building or associated structure.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.304. DESIGN-BUILD FIRMS. A design-build firm under this subchapter must be a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity or team that includes an architect or engineer and a construction contractor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.305. USE OF ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER AS INDEPENDENT REPRESENTATIVE. The governmental entity shall select or designate an architect or engineer independent of the design-build firm to act as the governmental entity's representative for the duration of the project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.306. PREPARATION OF REQUEST. (a) The governmental entity shall prepare a request for qualifications that includes general information on the project site, project scope, budget, special systems, selection criteria and the weighted value for each criterion, and other information that may assist potential design-build firms in submitting proposals for the project.

(b) The governmental entity shall also prepare the design criteria package that includes more detailed information on the project. If the preparation of the design criteria package requires architectural or engineering services that constitute the practice of architecture within the meaning of Chapter 1051, Occupations Code, or the practice of engineering within the meaning of Chapter 1001, Occupations Code, those services shall be provided in accordance with the applicable law.

(c) The design criteria package must include a set of documents that provides sufficient information, including criteria for selection, to permit a design-build firm to prepare a response to the governmental entity's request for qualifications and to provide any additional information requested. The design criteria package must specify criteria the governmental entity considers necessary to describe the project and may include, as appropriate, the legal description of the site, survey information concerning the site, interior space requirements, special material requirements, material quality standards, conceptual criteria for the project, special equipment requirements, cost or budget estimates, time schedules, quality assurance and quality control requirements, site development requirements, applicable codes and ordinances, provisions for utilities, parking requirements, and any other requirement.

(d) The governmental entity may not require offerors to submit architectural or engineering designs as part of a proposal or a response to a request for qualifications.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.307. EVALUATION OF DESIGN-BUILD FIRMS. (a) For each design-build firm that responded to the request for qualifications, the governmental entity shall evaluate the firm's experience, technical competence, and capability to perform, the past performance of the firm and members of the firm, and other appropriate factors submitted by the firm in response to the request for qualifications, except that cost-related or price-related evaluation factors are not permitted.

(b) Each firm must certify to the governmental entity that each architect or engineer that is a member of the firm was selected based on demonstrated competence and qualifications, in the manner provided by Section 2254.004.

(c) The governmental entity shall qualify a maximum of five responders to submit proposals that contain additional information and, if the governmental entity chooses, to interview for final selection.

(d) The governmental entity shall evaluate the additional information submitted by the offerors on the basis of the selection criteria stated in the request for qualifications and the results of any interview.

(e) The governmental entity may request additional information regarding demonstrated competence and qualifications, considerations of the safety and long-term durability of the project, the feasibility of implementing the project as proposed, the ability of the offeror to meet schedules, or costing methodology. As used in this subsection, "costing methodology" means an offeror's policies on subcontractor markup, definition of general conditions, range of cost for general conditions, policies on retainage, policies on contingencies, discount for prompt payment, and expected staffing for administrative duties. The term does not include a guaranteed maximum price or bid for overall design or construction.

(f) The governmental entity shall rank each proposal submitted on the basis of the criteria set forth in the request for qualifications.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.308. SELECTION OF DESIGN-BUILD FIRM. (a) The governmental entity shall select the design-build firm that submits the proposal offering the best value for the governmental entity on the basis of the published selection criteria and on its ranking evaluations.

(b) The governmental entity shall first attempt to negotiate a contract with the selected firm.

(c) If the governmental entity is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the selected firm, the governmental entity shall, formally and in writing, end all negotiations with that firm and proceed to negotiate with the next firm in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or negotiations with all ranked firms end.

(d) Not later than the seventh day after the date the contract is awarded, the governmental entity shall make the rankings determined under Section 2269.307(f) public.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(12), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.309. SUBMISSION OF DESIGN AFTER SELECTION. After selection of the design-build firm, that firm's architects or engineers shall submit all design elements for review and determination of scope compliance to the governmental entity or the governmental entity's architect or engineer before or concurrently with construction.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.310. FINAL CONSTRUCTION DOCUMENTS. The design-build firm shall supply a set of construction documents for the completed project to the governmental entity at the conclusion of construction. The documents must note any changes made during construction.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.311. PERFORMANCE OR PAYMENT BOND. (a) A payment or performance bond is not required and may not provide coverage for the design portion of the design-build contract with the design-build firm under this subchapter.

(b) If a fixed contract amount or guaranteed maximum price has not been determined at the time the design-build contract is awarded, the penal sums of the performance and payment bonds delivered to the governmental entity must each be in an amount equal to the construction budget, as specified in the design criteria package.

(c) The design-build firm shall deliver the bonds not later than the 10th day after the date the design-build firm executes the contract unless the design-build firm furnishes a bid bond or other financial security acceptable to the governmental entity to ensure that the design-build firm will furnish the required performance and payment bonds before construction begins.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER H. DESIGN-BUILD PROCEDURES FOR CERTAIN CIVIL WORKS PROJECTS

Sec. 2269.351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Civil works project" means:

(A) roads, streets, bridges, utilities, water supply projects, water plants, wastewater plants, water distribution and wastewater conveyance facilities, desalination projects, wharves, docks, airport runways and taxiways, storm drainage and flood control projects, or transit projects;

(B) types of projects or facilities related to those described by Paragraph (A) and associated with civil engineering construction; and

(C) buildings or structures that are incidental to projects or facilities that are described by Paragraphs (A) and (B) and that are primarily civil engineering construction projects.

(2) "Design-build firm" means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity or team that includes an engineer and a construction contractor qualified to engage in civil works construction in Texas.

(3) "Design criteria package" means a set of documents that:

(A) provides sufficient information to convey the intent, goals, criteria, and objectives of the civil works project; and

(B) permits a design-build firm to:

(i) assess the scope of work and the risk involved; and

(ii) submit a proposal on the project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.352. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies to a governmental entity that:

(1) has a population of more than 100,000 within the entity's geographic boundary or service area; or

(2) is a board of trustees governed by Chapter 54, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.353. CONTRACTS FOR CIVIL WORKS PROJECTS: DESIGN-BUILD. (a) A governmental entity may use the design-build method for the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of a civil works project. In using this method and in entering into a contract for the services of a design-build firm, the contracting governmental entity and the design-build firm shall follow the procedures provided by this subchapter.

(b) A contract for a project under this subchapter may cover only a single integrated project. A governmental entity may not enter into a contract for aggregated projects at multiple locations. For purposes of this subsection:

(1) if a metropolitan transit authority created under Chapter 451, Transportation Code, enters into a contract for a project involving a linear transit project with multiple stops along the project route for boarding passengers, created under Chapter 451, Transportation Code, the linear transit project is a single integrated project; and

(2) a water treatment plant, including a desalination plant, that includes treatment facilities, well fields, and pipelines is a single integrated project.

(c) A governmental entity shall use the following criteria as a minimum basis for determining the circumstances under which the design-build method is appropriate for a project:

(1) the extent to which the entity can adequately define the project requirements;

(2) the time constraints for the delivery of the project;

(3) the ability to ensure that a competitive procurement can be held; and

(4) the capability of the entity to manage and oversee the project, including the availability of experienced personnel or outside consultants who are familiar with the design-build method of project delivery.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 1050), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(13), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 1050), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 1050), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.354. LIMITATION ON NUMBER OF PROJECTS. (a) After August 31, 2013:

(1) a governmental entity with a population of 500,000 or more within the entity's geographic boundary or service area may, under this subchapter, enter into contracts for not more than six projects in any fiscal year;

(2) a municipally owned water utility with a separate governing board appointed by the governing body of a municipality with a population of 500,000 or more may:

(A) independently enter into contracts for not more than two civil works projects in any fiscal year; and

(B) enter into contracts for additional civil works projects in any fiscal year, but not more than the number of civil works projects prescribed by the limit in Subdivision (1) for the municipality, provided that:

(i) the additional contracts for the civil works projects entered into by the utility under this paragraph are allocated to the number of contracts the municipality that appoints the utility's governing board may enter under Subdivision (1); and

(ii) the governing body of the municipality must approve the contracts; and

(3) a governmental entity that has a population of 100,000 or more but less than 500,000 or is a board of trustees governed by Chapter 54, Transportation Code, may enter into contracts under this subchapter for not more than four projects in any fiscal year.

(b) For purposes of determining the number of eligible projects under this section, a municipally owned water utility with a separate governing board appointed by the governing body of the municipality is considered part of the municipality.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 1050), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1356 (S.B. 1430), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 2269.355. USE OF ENGINEER. (a) The governmental entity shall select or designate an engineer who is independent of the design-build firm to act as its representative for the procurement process and for the duration of the work on the civil works project. The selected or designated engineer has full responsibility for complying with Chapter 1001, Occupations Code.

(b) If the engineer is not a full-time employee of the governmental entity, the governmental entity shall select the engineer on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications as provided by Section 2254.004.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.356. USE OF OTHER PROFESSIONAL SERVICES. (a) The governmental entity shall provide or contract for, independently of the design-build firm, the following services as necessary for the acceptance of the civil works project by the entity:

(1) inspection services;

(2) construction materials engineering and testing; and

(3) verification testing services.

(b) The governmental entity shall select the services for which it contracts under this section in accordance with Section 2254.004.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.357. REQUEST FOR QUALIFICATIONS. (a) The governmental entity shall prepare a request for qualifications that includes:

(1) information on the civil works project site;

(2) project scope;

(3) project budget;

(4) project schedule;

(5) criteria for selection under Section 2269.359 and the weighting of the criteria; and

(6) other information that may assist potential design-build firms in submitting proposals for the project.

(b) The governmental entity shall also prepare a design criteria package as described by Section 2269.358.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(14), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.358. CONTENTS OF DESIGN CRITERIA PACKAGE. A design criteria package may include, as appropriate:

(1) budget or cost estimates;

(2) information on the site;

(3) performance criteria;

(4) special material requirements;

(5) initial design calculations;

(6) known utilities;

(7) capacity requirements;

(8) quality assurance and quality control requirements;

(9) the type, size, and location of structures; and

(10) notice of any ordinances, rules, or goals adopted by the governmental entity relating to awarding contracts to historically underutilized businesses.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.359. EVALUATION OF DESIGN-BUILD FIRMS. (a) The governmental entity shall receive proposals and shall evaluate each offeror's experience, technical competence, and capability to perform, the past performance of the offeror's team and members of the team, and other appropriate factors submitted by the team or firm in response to the request for qualifications, except that cost-related or price-related evaluation factors are not permitted at this stage.

(b) Each offeror must:

(1) select or designate each engineer that is a member of its team based on demonstrated competence and qualifications, in the manner provided by Section 2254.004; and

(2) certify to the governmental entity that each selection or designation was based on demonstrated competence and qualifications, in the manner provided by Section 2254.004.

(c) The governmental entity shall qualify offerors to submit additional information and, if the entity chooses, to interview for final selection.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.360. SELECTION OF DESIGN-BUILD FIRM. The governmental entity shall select a design-build firm using a combination of technical and cost proposals as provided by Section 2269.361.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(15), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.361. PROCEDURES FOR COMBINATION OF TECHNICAL AND COST PROPOSALS. (a) A governmental entity shall request proposals from design-build firms identified under Section 2269.359(c). A response to a request for detailed proposals must be submitted on or before the earlier of the time for submission requested by the governmental entity or the 180th day after the date the governmental entity makes a public request for the proposals from the selected firms. The request for proposals must include:

(1) a design criteria package;

(2) if the project site is identified, a geotechnical baseline report or other information that provides the design-build firm minimum geotechnical design parameters to submit a proposal;

(3) detailed instructions for preparing the technical proposal and the items to be included, including a description of the form and level of completeness of drawings expected; and

(4) the relative weighting of the technical and price proposals and the formula by which the proposals will be evaluated and ranked.

(b) The technical proposal is a component of the proposal under this section.

(c) Each proposal must include a sealed technical proposal and a separate sealed cost proposal.

(d) The technical proposal must address:

(1) project approach;

(2) anticipated problems;

(3) proposed solutions to anticipated problems;

(4) ability to meet schedules;

(5) conceptual engineering design; and

(6) other information requested by the governmental entity.

(e) The governmental entity shall first open, evaluate, and score each responsive technical proposal submitted on the basis of the criteria described in the request for proposals and assign points on the basis of the weighting specified in the request for proposals. The governmental entity may reject as nonresponsive any firm that makes a significant change to the composition of its firm as initially submitted. The governmental entity shall subsequently open, evaluate, and score the cost proposals from firms that submitted a responsive technical proposal and assign points on the basis of the weighting specified in the request for proposals. The governmental entity shall select the design-build firm in accordance with the formula provided in the request for proposals.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(16), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 556 (S.B. 533), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 2269.3615. IDENTIFICATION OF PROJECT TEAM. (a) A governmental entity may require a design-build firm responding to a request for detailed proposals to identify companies that will:

(1) fill key project roles, including project management, lead design firm, quality control management, and quality assurance management; and

(2) serve as key task leaders for geotechnical, hydraulics and hydrology, structural, environmental, utility, and right-of-way issues.

(b) If a design-build firm required to identify companies under Subsection (a) is selected for a design-build agreement, the firm may not make changes to the identified companies unless an identified company:

(1) is no longer in business, is unable to fulfill its legal, financial, or business obligations, or can no longer meet the terms of the teaming agreement with the design-build firm;

(2) voluntarily removes itself from the team;

(3) fails to provide a sufficient number of qualified personnel to fulfill the duties identified during the proposal stage; or

(4) fails to negotiate in good faith in a timely manner in accordance with provisions established in the teaming agreement proposed for the project.

(c) If the design-build firm makes team changes in violation of Subsection (b), any cost savings resulting from the change accrue to the governmental entity and not to the design-build firm.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (H.B. 1050), Sec. 5(b), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.362. NEGOTIATION. After selecting the highest-ranked design-build firm under Section 2269.361, the governmental entity shall first attempt to negotiate a contract with the selected firm. If the governmental entity is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the selected firm, the entity shall, formally and in writing, end all negotiations with that firm and proceed to negotiate with the next firm in the order of the selection ranking until a contract is reached or negotiations with all ranked firms end.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(17), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.363. ASSUMPTION OF RISKS. The governmental entity shall assume:

(1) all risks and costs associated with:

(A) scope changes and modifications, as requested by the governmental entity;

(B) unknown or differing site conditions unless otherwise provided by the governmental entity in the request for proposals and final contract;

(C) regulatory permitting, if the governmental entity is responsible for those risks and costs by law or contract; and

(D) natural disasters and other force majeure events unless otherwise provided by the governmental entity in the request for proposals and final contract; and

(2) all costs associated with property acquisition, excluding costs associated with acquiring a temporary easement or work area associated with staging or construction for the project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.364. STIPEND AMOUNT FOR UNSUCCESSFUL OFFERORS. (a) Unless a stipend is paid under Subsection (c), the design-build firm retains all rights to the work product submitted in a proposal. The governmental entity may not release or disclose to any person, including the successful offeror, the work product contained in an unsuccessful proposal. The governmental entity shall return all copies of the proposal and other information submitted to an unsuccessful offeror. The governmental entity or its agents may not make use of any unique or nonordinary design element, technique, method, or process contained in the unsuccessful proposal that was not also contained in the successful proposal at the time of the original submittal, unless the entity acquires a license from the unsuccessful offeror.

(b) A violation of this section voids the contract for the project entered into by the governmental entity. The governmental entity is liable to any unsuccessful offeror, or any member of the design-build team or its assignee, for one-half of the cost savings associated with the unauthorized use of the work product of the unsuccessful offeror. Any interested party may bring an action for an injunction, declaratory relief, or damages for a violation of this section. A party who prevails in an action under this subsection is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees as approved by the court.

(c) The governmental entity may offer an unsuccessful design-build firm that submits a response to the entity's request for additional information under Section 2269.361 a stipend for preliminary engineering costs associated with the development of the proposal. The stipend must be one-half of one percent of the contract amount and must be specified in the initial request for proposals. If the offer is accepted and paid, the governmental entity may make use of any work product contained in the proposal, including the techniques, methods, processes, and information contained in the proposal. The use by the governmental entity of any design element contained in an unsuccessful proposal is at the sole risk and discretion of the entity and does not confer liability on the recipient of the stipend under this subsection.

(d) Notwithstanding other law, including Chapter 552, work product contained in an unsuccessful proposal submitted and rejected under this subchapter is confidential and may not be released unless a stipend offer has been accepted and paid as provided by Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(18), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.365. COMPLETION OF DESIGN. (a) Following selection of a design-build firm under this subchapter, the firm's engineers shall submit all design elements for review and determination of scope compliance to the governmental entity before or concurrently with construction.

(b) An appropriately licensed design professional shall sign and seal construction documents before the documents are released for construction.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.366. FINAL CONSTRUCTION DOCUMENTS. At the conclusion of construction, the design-build firm shall supply to the governmental entity a record set of construction documents for the project prepared as provided by Chapter 1001, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.367. PERFORMANCE OR PAYMENT BOND. (a) A performance or payment bond is not required for the portion of a design-build contract under this section that includes design services only.

(b) If a fixed contract amount or guaranteed maximum price has not been determined at the time a design-build contract is awarded, the penal sums of the performance and payment bonds delivered to the governmental entity must each be in an amount equal to the construction budget, if commercially available and practical, as specified in the design criteria package.

(c) If the governmental entity awards a design-build contract under Section 2269.362, the design-build firm shall deliver the bonds not later than the 10th day after the date the design-build firm executes the contract unless the design-build firm furnishes a bid bond or other financial security acceptable to the governmental entity to ensure that the design-build firm will furnish the required performance and payment bonds before the commencement of construction.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(19), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER I. JOB ORDER CONTRACTS METHOD

Sec. 2269.401. JOB ORDER CONTRACTING. In this chapter, "job order contracting" is a procurement method used for maintenance, repair, alteration, renovation, remediation, or minor construction of a facility when the work is of a recurring nature but the delivery times, type, and quantities of work required are indefinite.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.402. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER TO BUILDINGS; EXCEPTIONS. This subchapter applies only to a facility that is a building, the design and construction of which is governed by accepted building codes, or a structure or land, whether improved or unimproved, that is associated with a building. This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) a highway, road, street, bridge, utility, water supply project, water plant, wastewater plant, water and wastewater distribution or conveyance facility, wharf, dock, airport runway or taxiway, drainage project, or related type of project associated with civil engineering construction; or

(2) a building or structure that is incidental to a project that is primarily a civil engineering construction project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.403. REQUIREMENTS FOR JOB ORDER CONTRACTS FOR FACILITIES. (a) A governmental entity may award job order contracts for the maintenance, repair, alteration, renovation, remediation, or minor construction of a facility if:

(1) the work is of a recurring nature but the delivery times are indefinite; and

(2) indefinite quantities and orders are awarded substantially on the basis of predescribed and prepriced tasks.

(b) The governmental entity shall establish the maximum aggregate contract price when it advertises the proposal.

(c) The governing body of a governmental entity shall approve each job, task, or purchase order that exceeds $500,000.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.404. CONTRACTUAL UNIT PRICES. The governmental entity may establish contractual unit prices for a job order contract by:

(1) specifying one or more published construction unit price books and the applicable divisions or line items; or

(2) providing a list of work items and requiring the offerors to propose one or more coefficients or multipliers to be applied to the price book or prepriced work items as the price proposal.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.405. COMPETITIVE SEALED PROPOSAL METHOD. (a) A governmental entity may use the competitive sealed proposal method under Subchapter D for job order contracts.

(b) The governmental entity shall advertise for, receive, and publicly open sealed proposals for job order contracts.

(c) The governmental entity may require offerors to submit information in addition to rates, including experience, past performance, and proposed personnel and methodology.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.406. AWARDING OF JOB ORDER CONTRACTS. The governmental entity may award job order contracts to one or more job order contractors in connection with each solicitation of proposals.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.407. USE OF JOB ORDER CONTRACT. A job order contract may be used to accomplish work only for the governmental entity that awards the contract unless:

(1) the solicitation for the job order contract and the contract specifically provide for use by other persons; or

(2) the governmental entity enters into an interlocal agreement that provides otherwise.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.408. USE OF ARCHITECT OR ENGINEER. (a) If a job order contract or an order issued under the contract requires architectural or engineering services that constitute the practice of architecture within the meaning of Chapter 1051, Occupations Code, or the practice of engineering within the meaning of Chapter 1001, Occupations Code, the governmental entity shall select or designate an architect or engineer to prepare the construction documents for the project.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a job order contract or an order issued under the contract for industrialized housing, industrialized buildings, or relocatable educational facilities subject to and approved under Chapter 1202, Occupations Code, if the contractor employs the services of an architect or engineer who approves the documents for the project.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.409. JOB ORDER CONTRACT TERM. The base term for a job order contract may not exceed two years. The governmental entity may renew the contract annually for not more than three additional years.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.410. JOB ORDERS. (a) An order for a job or project under a job order contract must be signed by the governmental entity's representative and the contractor.

(b) The order may be:

(1) a fixed price, lump-sum contract based substantially on contractual unit pricing applied to estimated quantities; or

(2) a unit price order based on the quantities and line items delivered.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.411. PAYMENT AND PERFORMANCE BONDS. The contractor shall provide payment and performance bonds, if required by law, based on the amount or estimated amount of any order.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER J. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 2269.451. VOID CONTRACT. A contract, including a job order, entered into in violation of this chapter is voidable as against public policy.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 2269.452. DECLARATORY OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF. (a) This chapter may be enforced through an action for declaratory or injunctive relief filed not later than the 15th calendar day after the date on which the contract is awarded.

(b) This section does not apply to enforcement of a contract entered into by a state agency. In this subsection, "state agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 2151.002. The term includes the Texas Facilities Commission.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 628), Sec. 2.08, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Government Code, Chapter 2267 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(23), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 702 (H.B. 2581), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.